Maine, session 132, LD851.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1995, c. 568, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Licensed activity. The holder of a Class I, Class II, Class III, apprentice, senior
retiree or student lobster and crab fishing license may fish for, take, possess, ship or
transport within the State lobsters or crabs and sell lobsters or crabs the license holder has
taken. The license does not authorize the license holder to remove lobster meat from the
shell or to take, possess, transport or ship lobster parts or meat. The holder of a Class II or
Class III license is liable for the licensed activities under this subsection of all unlicensed
crew members assisting that licensee.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§3-A, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. A senior retiree lobster and crab fishing license authorizes the license holder to
engage in the licensed activities under subsection 2. A person issued a senior retiree
lobster and crab fishing license may not submerge at any one time more than 100
lobster traps in the coastal waters of the State. A person issued a senior retiree lobster
and crab fishing license may not set traps before May 1st and must remove all traps by
December 1st.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§5-F is enacted to read:
5-F. Senior retiree lobster and crab fishing license eligibility. A senior retiree
lobster and crab fishing license may be issued only to a person who, at the time of
application, is 65 years of age or older, has been a resident of the State for a minimum of
10 years and previously held a commercial lobster and crab fishing license for 3 or more
consecutive years.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§7-B, ¶Q, as amended by PL 2019, c. 575, §1, is
further amended to read:
Q. For a noncommercial lobster and crab fishing license, $60, except as provided in
subsection 7‑D; and
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§7-B, ¶R, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. EEEEE,
§3, is amended to read:
R. For a nonresident lobster and crab landing permit, $590.25.; and
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §6421, sub-§7-B, ¶S is enacted to read:
S. For a senior retiree lobster and crab fishing license, $60.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §6446, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 68, §5, is further
amended to read:
1-A. Declared lobster zone; authorized zones. On an application for a Class I, Class
II, Class III, senior retiree, student or noncommercial lobster and crab fishing license or a
nonresident lobster and crab landing permit, a person shall declare the lobster management
zone in which that person proposes to fish a majority of that person's lobster traps and shall
list all other zones in which that person proposes to fish any of that person's lobster traps.
A Class I, Class II, Class III, senior retiree, student or noncommercial lobster and crab
fishing license or a nonresident lobster and crab landing permit must identify the declared
Page 1 - 132LR0936(01)

412 lobster zone in which the person is authorized to fish a majority of that person's lobster
423 traps and must identify all other zones in which a person is authorized to fish that person's
434 traps. A person may not place any lobster traps in a zone that is not identified on that
445 person's license. For the purposes of this subsection, the majority of a person's lobster traps
456 must be determined from the number of trap tags issued to that person.